Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1901
Subpoenas in traffic and criminal cases; provisions applicable.

(1) The statutes governing subpoenas in civil actions and proceedings shall also govern subpoenas in traffic and criminal cases, except that subsections (1), (3), and (4) of section 25-1228 shall not apply to those cases. The payment of compensation and mileage to witnesses in those cases shall be governed by section 29-1903.

(2) A trial subpoena in a traffic and criminal case shall contain the statement specified in subsection (5) of section 25-1223.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 459, p. 824;

R.S.1913, § 9099;

C.S.1922, § 10124;

C.S.1929, § 29-1901;

R.S.1943, § 29-1901;

Laws 1990, LB 87, § 3;

Laws 1992, LB 435, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 1059, § 23;

Laws 2017, LB509, § 5.

Witness in criminal case cannot justify failure to obey subpoena on ground that he had demanded his fees and they were not paid. Huckins v. State, 61 Neb. 871, 86 N.W. 485 (1901).